Alaska, session 34, HB278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.33 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Article 7A. Alaska-Ireland Trade Commission. 06 Sec. 44.33.440. Alaska-Ireland Trade Commission. (a) The Alaska-Ireland 07 Trade Commission is established in the department. 08 (b) The commission consists of the following members: 09 (1) five members appointed by the governor; 10 (2) two members of the house of representatives appointed by the 11 speaker of the house of representatives; and 12 (3) two members of the senate appointed by president of the senate. 13 (c) The members of the commission appointed under (b)(1) of this section 14 serve staggered three-year terms. The members of the commission appointed under 01 (b)(2) and (3) of this section serve two-year terms. A member of the commission 02 serves at the pleasure of the member's appointing authority. 03 (d) The purpose of the commission is to 04 (1) advance bilateral trade and investment between the state and 05 Ireland; 06 (2) initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to the state 07 and Ireland; 08 (3) promote business, entrepreneurship, new venture development, and 09 academic exchanges between the state and Ireland; 10 (4) promote research collaborations and funding opportunities that 11 advance the mutual interests of the state and Ireland; 12 (5) encourage mutual economic support between the state and Ireland; 13 (6) encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of the state and 14 Ireland; and 15 (7) address other issues as determined by the commission. 16 (e) The commission shall elect a chair from among its members. A majority of 17 the members of the commission constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. 18 (f) Except for meetings held outside of the state that the commission 19 determines should be conducted in person, the commission shall meet by electronic 20 means. The commission shall provide public notice of a meeting at least seven days 21 before the meeting. 22 (g) If the department obtains the information required under (i)(1) of this 23 section and provides a copy of that information to the commission, the department 24 may accept a grant, donation, or gift from a public or private source to pay for 25 (1) per diem and travel expenses of the commission; or 26 (2) other assistance and support the commission requires to carry out 27 the purposes of this section . 28 (h) Except as permitted under (g)(1) of this section, members of the 29 commission serve without compensation and are not entitled to per diem and travel 30 expenses authorized by law under AS 39.20.180. 31 (i) By the 30th day of each regular legislative session, the commission shall 01 prepare a report, deliver the report to the governor, senate secretary, and chief clerk of 02 the house of representatives, and notify the legislature that the report is available. The 03 report must include 04 (1) information on the grants, donations, and gifts accepted under (g) 05 of this section in the previous year, including 06 (A) the date and amount or value of each grant, donation, and 07 gift; 08 (B) the total amount or value of all grants, donations, and gifts; 09 (C) the name and address of each person who made a grant, 10 donation, or gift, and the dates and total amount or value of the grants, 11 donations, or gifts; and 12 (D) for grants, donations, or gifts in excess of $50 in the 13 aggregate during the previous year, the principal occupation and employer of 14 the person who made the grant, donation, or gift; and 15 (2) the commission's findings, results, and recommendations. 16 (j) The commission may not contract for writing services or support to prepare 17 the report required under (i) of this section unless a grant, donation, or gift is made for 18 that purpose under (g) of this section. The department may not provide staff to the 19 commission to provide writing services or support to prepare the report required under 20 (i) of this section. 21 (k) In this section, "department" means the Department of Commerce, 22 Community, and Economic Development. 23 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 24 read: 25 INITIAL APPOINTMENT; STAGGERED TERMS. Notwithstanding 26 AS 44.33.440(b)(1), enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, the members of the Alaska-Ireland Trade 27 Commission appointed under AS 44.33.440(b)(1), enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, are appointed 28 to initial terms as follows: 29 (1) one member shall serve a one-year term; 30 (2) two members shall serve two-year terms; and 31 (3) two members shall serve three-year terms. 01 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.